Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-1847
Violations; penalty.

Any person who shall willfully violate any of the provisions of the Civil Service Act shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1943, c. 29, § 22, p. 138;

R.S.1943, § 19-1822;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 19-1822;

Laws 1985, LB 372, § 26.